Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.800

Outcomes of advanced procedures—Report. (Expires December 31, 2028.)

(1) The board shall develop a process for an optometrist that has received an endorsement to perform advanced procedures authorized under RCW 18.53.010 to submit information to the board on the outcome, including any complication or adverse event, of every advanced procedure that the optometrist completed in the previous year. An optometrist with a license endorsement must file this information in the manner determined by the board at the time of license renewal. All information submitted under this subsection is confidential and may not be disclosed under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(2) By December 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the board in coordination with the department of health must analyze and report on the outcomes of the advanced procedures authorized in RCW 18.53.010 during the previous year. The report should include any complications or adverse events related to the performance of advanced procedures. The data should be aggregated and not identify any individual provider or facility and may not reveal any confidential information. The department of health must make this report publicly available on its website.

(3) This section expires December 31, 2028.

[ 2023 c 400 s 4.]